Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 Prohibited Acts
3-3-26.
Prohibition on drinking of alcoholic beverages on retail package premises; sampling permitted; regulation.

Except as provided in this Code section or Chapter 15 of this title, no retail package liquor store shall knowingly and intentionally allow or permit the breaking of any package or packages containing alcoholic beverages on the premises where sold or allow or permit the drinking of the contents of such package or packages on the premises where sold.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to prohibit a representative or salesperson of a manufacturer or wholesaler from opening a package of alcoholic beverages on the premises of a retail package liquor store or other retail dealer for the purpose of providing samples of such alcoholic beverage product to a retail dealer or its employees for consumption on the licensed premises, provided that:

All samples are provided and consumed in the presence of a representative or salesperson of the manufacturer or wholesaler in an office, storage room, or other area of the licensed premises of the retail dealer that is closed to the public; and

Such representative or salesperson of the manufacturer or wholesaler removes from the licensed premises any packages he or she brought onto such licensed premises in order to provide samples of alcoholic beverage products.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “sample” means a small amount of any malt beverage, wine, or distilled spirits.

The commissioner shall promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as he or she may deem reasonable and necessary to effectuate the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9; Code 1933, § 5A-513, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 5/HB 879.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), substituted “Except as provided in this Code section or Chapter 15 of this title, no retail package liquor store” for “No retail dealer” at the beginning and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “This Code section shall not apply with respect to sales pursuant to a license for consumption on the premises.”; and added subsections (b) and (c).

3-3-27.
Unlawful manufacture, transportation, receipt, possession, sale, or distribution of alcoholic beverages; failure to file proper reports or bonds or pay fees; declaration of apparatus used in unlawful manufacture of alcoholic beverages as contraband; penalties.

No person knowingly and intentionally shall:

Distill, manufacture, or make any distilled spirits, except as permitted by this title;

Manufacture, make, brew, or ferment any malt beverages or wine, except as permitted by this title;

Transport, ship, receive, possess, sell, offer to sell, distribute, or in any manner use any alcoholic beverages or alcohol, except as permitted by this title;

Fail to file any report required by this title;

File any report required by this title that is either intentionally false or fraudulent, or both;

Fail to pay any tax or license fee imposed or authorized by this title unless specifically exempted from such payment;

Fail to have a sufficient bond filed with the commissioner as required by this title; or

Evade or violate, or conspire to evade or violate, any provision of this title.

Any apparatus, article, or other tangible personal property used in the unlawful distillation, manufacture, or making of any alcoholic beverages is declared contraband and shall be destroyed by the officers or agents seizing the property or otherwise disposed of as the commissioner directs.

Any person who violates the provisions of:

Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years;

Paragraphs (2) through (8) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 5A-514, 5A-9902, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 65.

Cross references.

Applicability of weapons-forfeiture laws to motor vehicles used in commission of crime, §

17-5-51

.

3-3-27.1.
Report to the commissioner of alcoholic beverages transported into this state.

Except with respect to alcoholic beverages lawfully possessed pursuant to Code Section 3-3-8, no person, common carrier, or contract carrier shall transport any alcoholic beverage into this state unless such transportation is immediately reported to the commissioner. Each such report shall show the consignor and consignee, the quantity delivered, and such other information as required by the commissioner.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-514.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 23.

3-3-28.
[Reserved] Reuse, counterfeiting, or forging of tax stamps.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 11; Code 1933, § 5A-515, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 528, § 1/HB 558, effective July 1, 2005.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 528, § 1/HB 558 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2005.

3-3-29.
Possession, sale, or purchase of distilled spirits for which taxes not paid.

Except as otherwise expressly provided for by law, no person knowingly and intentionally shall possess, sell, or purchase any distilled spirits upon which the taxes imposed by this title have not been paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 11; Code 1933, § 5A-516, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 464, § 1.

Cross references.

Seizure and disposition as contraband of alcoholic beverages on which taxes or license fees not paid, §

3-2-33

et seq.

3-3-30.
Storage and distribution of alcoholic beverages by corporations granted the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining foreign trade zones.

Any provision of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, any public or private corporation which has been granted the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone by the Foreign Trade Zones Board in accordance with an act of Congress, approved June 18, 1934, entitled “An Act to provide for the establishment, operation and maintenance of foreign trade zones in ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce and for other purposes,” may store alcoholic beverages, until the termination of such privilege, within the boundaries of such foreign trade zone. Any public or private corporation which has been granted the privilege of establishing, operating, or maintaining a foreign trade zone may also distribute alcoholic beverages to destinations outside this state.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall authorize the sale at retail of any alcoholic beverages within the boundaries of a foreign trade zone if the sale would otherwise be prohibited by the laws of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-518, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 24.

Cross references.

Foreign trade zones generally, T. 52, C. 10.

U.S. Code.

Foreign trade zones, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

19 U.S.C. § 81

a et seq.

3-3-31.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds, determines, and declares that the direct shipment of alcoholic beverages by persons in the business of selling alcoholic beverages in other states or countries to residents of this state in violation of this title poses a serious threat to the public health, safety, revenue, and the economy of Georgia. The General Assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the present penalties for illegal direct shipments of alcoholic beverages to residents of this state are inadequate to ensure compliance with the provisions of this title and that the measures provided for in Code Section 3-3-32 are fully consistent with the powers conferred upon the State of Georgia by the Twenty-first Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 3.

Cross references.

Creation of limited exceptions, §

3-6-30

.

3-3-32.
Shipment of alcoholic beverages into state by nonresident, without license, who is in business of selling alcoholic beverages in another state.

Any person in the business of selling alcoholic beverages in another state or country who knowingly and intentionally ships or causes to be shipped any alcoholic beverages directly to any resident of this state who does not hold a valid manufacturer’s, importer’s, broker’s, or wholesaler’s license issued by the State of Georgia is in violation of this chapter.

Any person found by the commissioner to be in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be issued a cease and desist order by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery. Any person who, after receiving a cease and desist order, is found by the commissioner to be in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section for a second or subsequent occurrence, within a two-year period of the first violation, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00. This subsection shall not apply to any person who has registered brands for sale with the commissioner pursuant to Code Section 3-4-152, 3-5-31 or 3-6-22 and who shall have current licenses and posted adequate surety bonds as required by this title; provided, however, violations of the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall constitute grounds for the commissioner to take appropriate administrative action against such person, including suspension or cancellation of license and forfeiture of bonds.

This Code section shall not apply to the direct shipment of sacramental alcoholic beverages to bona fide religious organizations as authorized by the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

3-3-33.
Vaporized form of alcoholic beverages and alcohol vaporizing devices prohibited.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Alcohol vaporizing device” means any device, machine, or process that mixes any alcoholic beverages with pure oxygen or other gas to produce a vaporized product for the purpose of consumption by inhalation.

“Licensed premises” means any premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold or dispensed for consumption on the premises and shall include any premises which are required by law to be licensed to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.

“Operator” means an owner, license holder, operator, manager, or person in charge of any licensed premises.

No person shall purchase, offer for sale or use, sell, or use any vaporized form of an alcoholic beverage produced by an alcohol vaporizing device. This paragraph shall not apply to a product that contains alcohol as otherwise lawfully prescribed by a health care practitioner who is licensed under Title 43.

No person shall own or possess any alcohol vaporizing device, including but not limited to any machine known as an Alcohol Without Liquid (AWOL) machine. This paragraph shall not apply to any nebulizer or atomizer used to supply a product that contains alcohol as otherwise lawfully prescribed by a health care practitioner who is licensed under Title 43.

No operator shall keep or allow to be kept on the licensed premises thereof any vaporized form of an alcoholic beverage produced by an alcohol vaporizing device.

Any person convicted of a violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person convicted of a violation of this Code section involving the offer for sale or use to a person under the age of 21 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, except that upon the second or subsequent conviction such person so convicted shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 346, § 1/HB 1066.

3-3-34.
“Powdered alcohol” defined; prohibition; exception; penalty.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “powdered alcohol” means a powdered or crystalline substance that contains any amount of alcohol for direct use or reconstitution.

No person shall manufacture, use, offer for use, purchase, offer to purchase, sell, offer to sell, or possess powdered alcohol.

No person licensed or issued a permit pursuant to this title shall use powdered alcohol as an alcoholic beverage or use powdered alcohol to create an alcoholic beverage.

This Code section shall not apply to the use of powdered alcohol for bona fide research purposes by a:

Health care provider that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research;

State institution;

Private college or university; or

Pharmaceutical or biotechnology company.

Any person convicted of a violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any violation of this Code section by a person licensed or issued a permit pursuant to this title shall constitute grounds for the suspension and revocation of any and all of such licenses and permits issued to such person.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 578, § 4/HB 152.